Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5312.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1401. (1) The Before July 1, 2026, the board of a school district may admit nonresident pupils to the schools of the district. The board shall determine the rates of tuition of the nonresident pupils and shall collect the tuition. (2) Tuition for grades K to 6 shall must not exceed 25% more than the operation cost per capita for the number of pupils in membership in grades K to 12. (3) Tuition for grades 7 to 12 shall must not exceed 12-1/2% more than 115% of the operation cost per capita for the number of pupils in membership in grades K to 12. (4) In a school district not maintaining grades above the eighth grade, the tuition shall must not exceed 25% more than the operation cost per capita for the number of pupils in membership in grades K to 8. (5) The operation costs and membership figures of the preceding fiscal year shall must be used. The per capita cost used shall must not include moneys expended for school sites, school building construction, equipment, payment of bonds, or other purposes not properly included in operation costs as determined by the state board. (6) On or after July 1, 2026, the board of a school district shall admit nonresident pupils to the schools of the district as described in section 105d of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1705d. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5310 (request no. H03337'25). (b) House Bill No. 5311 (request no. H03359'25).